

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 29, 2017 4:41 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview



800 Newport Center DriveSuite 700Newport Beach, CA 92660United States



Phone: 949-417-6500








Key Executives for KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.




Mr. Charles Jay Schreiber Jr.


      	Chairman of The Board and Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 66
        







Mr. Peter Milton Bren


      	President
      


Age: 83
        







Mr. Jeffrey  K. Waldvogel


      	Chief Financial Officer
      


Age: 40
        







Mr. Peter B. McMillan III


      	Executive Vice President, Treasurer, Secretary and Director
      


Age: 60
        







Mr. Keith D. Hall


      	Executive Vice President
      


Age: 59
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. Key Developments

KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. Approves the Appointment of Board of Directors
Jul 10 17
KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. approved the appointment of George R. Bravante, Jr., Jon D. Kline and Keith P. Russell as board of directors in the annual general meeting held on July 7, 2017.


KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. Appoints Peter M. Bren as Member of the Board of Directors Effective July 10, 2017
Jun 20 17
On June 14, 2017, the Board of Directors of KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. appointed Peter M. Bren, 83, to serve as a member of the Board of Directors, to fill a vacancy on the Board of Directors. Mr. Bren accepted the appointment effective as of July 10, 2017. Mr. Bren is also the company's President, a position he has held since January 2015. He is also Chairman and President of KBS Capital Advisors LLC, the company's external advisor and is President of KBS Real Estate Investment Trust, Inc. (KBS REIT I), KBS Real Estate Investment Trust II, Inc. (KBS REIT II) and KBS Real Estate Investment Trust III, Inc. (KBS REIT III), positions he has held for these entities since October 2004, June 2005, August 2007 and January 2010, respectively. Prior to taking his current positions as Chairman of the Board and President of the Advisor and KBS Realty Advisors, he served as the President of The Bren Company, was a Senior Partner of Lincoln Property Company and was President of Lincoln Property Company, Europe. Mr. Bren is also a founding member of the Richard S. Ziman Center for Real Estate at the UCLA Anderson School of Management. He is also a member of the Real Estate Roundtable in Washington, D.C.


Peter McMillan III to Resign as Member of KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.'s Board of Directors and as Executive Vice President, Secretary and Treasurer
Feb 15 17
On February 10, 2017, Peter McMillan III notified the board of directors of KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. of his decision to resign as a member of the company's board of directors and as Executive Vice President, Secretary and Treasurer of the company effective immediately.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      September 27, 2016
			    
The Offices at Greenhouse





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


338k
		Delaware
	

278k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

14k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










KBS Growth & Income REIT Inc: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























kbs growth & income reit inc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Real Estate
Sub-Industry: REIT
KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. operates as a real estate investment trust. The Company offers real estate management and development services. KBS Growth & Income REIT conducts its business in the United States.




Corporate Information
Address:

620 Newport Center Drive
Suite 1300
Newport Beach, CA 92660
United States


Phone:
-


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.kbs-cmg.com























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data




































KBS Growth & Income REIT Research Report - Revenue - Market Share - Competition - Growth
















     Target new business; track competition.
    


Subscribe
Log In











Solutions for: 
Investment BankingMarket ResearchPrivate EquityExecutivesConsultantsReporters & Journalists
 





✕
Log In

Email Address
 
Password
 






✕
Subscribe

Email Address
 
Password
 







KBS GROWTH & INCOME REIT


Premium Company Report








The Premium KBS Growth & Income REIT Company Report contains critical information including:
		Revenue from previous years (2010-2015)
		Growth rate
		Estimated financials and profit margin
		Funding from Venture Capital and Private Equity firms
		Latest trademark applications
		Additional industries in which the company operates
		

		$29.99


View subscription options







800 Newport Center Drive Newport Beach, CA 92660 
Company Profile & Financial Information for KBS Growth & Income REIT
KBS Growth & Income REIT's revenue, profitability, growth rate by year. Trademarks and applications show KBS Growth & Income REIT's marketing strategy.
	Precise revenue figures by year, number of employees, and trademarks indicate KBS Growth & Income REIT's strengths. 
KBS Growth & Income REIT operates in the N/A industry. 	A list of fastest growing competitors, and info on recession risks show KBS Growth & Income REIT's weaknesses relative to its competitors. 

	
Access the complete profile.


Fast Facts

Revenue$10 - $100 million    Exact Revenue in Premium ReportEmployeesN/AExact Employee Count Available in Premium ReportPrimary Industry N/A

Note: Revenues are statistical evaluations.

	KBS Growth & Income REIT's Business Operations Profile shows critical firmographic facts:
		What is the company's size? (Revenue and employees)
			What industry is the company in?
		

KBS Growth & Income REIT Revenue and Growth Rate

KBS Growth & Income REIT
Revenue ($ MM)Growth Rate (%)# Employees
2015Details in Premium Report
2014
2013
2012



1-Year Growth Rate:3-Year Growth Rate (CAGR):


Income Statement (Industry Averages)
KBS Growth & Income REIT's income statement based on industry averages: 

$ Millions(Industry Average)
Total Revenue


Operating Revenue
Cost of Goods Sold
Gross Profit
Operating Expenses
Pension, profit sharing plans, stock, annuity
Repairs
Rent paid on business property
Charitable Contributions
Depletion
Domestic production activities deduction
Advertising
Compensation of officers
Salaries and wages
Employee benefit programs
Taxes and Licenses
Bad Debts
Depreciation
Amortization
Other Operating Expenses
Total Operating Expenses
Operating Income
Non-Operating Income
EBITDA
EBIT (Earnings Before Interest and Taxes)
Interest Expense
Earnings Before Taxes
Income Tax
Net Profit
 


Recession Risk
	IncFact analyzed data from the last recession to determine whether KBS Growth & Income REIT grew or shrank over that period. We also looked at other companies in the industry
	 to compare how recession-proof KBS Growth & Income REIT is relative to the industry. While a new recession may strike a particular industry, measuring the
	 industry and company's robustness during the last recession estimates its ability to weather future recessions.

	
Nearby CompetitionInfo on companies that are located in close proximity to KBS Growth & Income REIT, operating in similar markets. 
		While some companies, particularly retail, compete with neighboring businesses for customers, other companies may compete to attract skilled employees. 
	

KBS Growth & Income REIT's CompetitorsRevenue ($ MM)





Fastest Growing CompetitorsThese companies are in the same general field as KBS Growth & Income REIT and are rapidly expanding. Companies may grow organically or through acquisition. In some cases apparently high growth rates may be caused by data that weren't available in previous years.
	

CompanyRevenue ($ MM)











   
Discover @ IncFact
Contact Us
Press & Media
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
(0.0178 s)
© 2017 IncFact.com. All Rights Reserved.










KBS Growth & Income REIT Inc. Terminates OfferingWhite Securities Law | Securities Fraud Attorneys and FINRA Arbitration Lawyers







































































































MENU








 June 29, 2017
 Comments (0)
 Current Investigations

KBS Growth & Income REIT Terminates Offering





(Last Updated On: June 29, 2017)Investigating Potential Claims Involving KBS Growth & Income REIT
Are you concerned about your investment losses in KBS Growth & Income REIT? If so, The White Law Group may be able to help you recover your losses by filing a FINRA Dispute Resolution claim against the brokerage firm that sold you the investment.
KBS Growth & Income REIT, a publicly registered non-traded real estate investment trust, was formed in January 2015 and has raised a combined $80 million in its private and public offerings.
The company often raises money for investments through Reg D private placement offerings like the company did for KBS Growth & Income REIT.  These Reg D private placements are then typically sold by brokerage firms in exchange for a large up front commission, usually between 7-10%, as well as additional “due diligence fees” that can range from 1-3%.
KBS Growth & Income REIT Inc. Closes Offering
KBS Growth & Income REIT Inc. is closing its primary offering at the end of the month, according to SEC filings. The REIT plans to continue offering shares under its distribution reinvestment plan.
The board of directors approved the offering termination effective June 30, 2017 to prepare for and market an online private offering to accredited investors. Subscriptions for the primary public offering must be received in good order no later than June 30th.
In connection with the preparation of an online private offering, the company said that it expects to establish and announce an estimated net asset value per share of its common stock. Following the NAV announcement, the REIT’s advisor, KBS Capital Advisors, has agreed to pay stockholders any difference between the “net price paid” by stockholders and the estimated NAV per share. “Net price paid” is the gross purchase price paid by stockholders less selling commissions and dealer manager fees.
The payment will be funded entirely by the advisor without any reimbursement from the REIT and is ineligible for reinvestment through the distribution reinvestment plan. The company noted that the tax treatment of the payment is not entirely clear, and stockholders should consult with their tax advisor to determine the associated tax consequences.
KBS Growth & Income REIT expects to declare an estimated NAV and the stockholder payment to be made before the end of the third quarter of 2017.
The Trouble with Alternative Investment Products
The trouble with alternative investment products, like KBS Growth & Income REIT, is that they involve a high degree of risk and are typically sold as unregistered securities which lack the same regulatory oversight as more traditional investment products like stocks or bonds.
The White Law Group is investigating the liability that brokerage firms may have for improperly selling private placements like KBS Growth & Income REIT and other KBS offerings.
Broker dealers that sell alternative investments are required to perform adequate due diligence on all investment recommendations to ensure that each investment recommendation that is made is suitable for the investor in light of the investor’s age, risk tolerance, net worth, financial needs, and investment experience.
However, another problem with Reg D private placements is that the high sales commissions and due diligence fees the brokers earn for selling such products.  Sometimes this provides brokers with an incentive to push the product to unsuspecting investors who do not fully understand the risks of these types of investments. They may even misrepresent the basic features of the products – usually focusing on the income potential and tax benefits while downplaying the risks.
Fortunately, FINRA does provide for an arbitration forum for investors to resolve such disputes. If a broker or brokerage firm makes an unsuitable investment recommendation or fails to adequately disclose the risks associated with an investment they may be found liable for investment losses in a FINRA arbitration claim.
Recovery of Investment Losses
To determine whether you may be able to recover investment losses incurred as a result of your purchase of KBS Growth & Income REIT or another KBS private placement investment, please contact The White Law Group at 1-888-637-5510 for a free consultation.
The White Law Group is a national securities fraud, securities arbitration, and investor protection law firm with offices in Chicago, Illinois and Vero Beach, Florida. The firm represents investors throughout the country in claims against their brokerage firm.
For more information on the firm and its representation of investors, visit www.WhiteSecuritiesLaw.com.
 
 




 » Chicago broker fraud attorney, Chicago FINRA attorney, Chicago investment fraud attorney, Chicago securities attorney, Chicago securities lawyer, KBS Growth & Income REIT attorney, KBS Growth & Income REIT class action, KBS Growth & Income REIT commissions, KBS Growth & Income REIT default, KBS Growth & Income REIT distributions, KBS Growth & Income REIT full cycle, KBS Growth & Income REIT illiquid, KBS Growth & Income REIT investigation, KBS Growth & Income REIT K1, KBS Growth & Income REIT lawsuit, KBS Growth & Income REIT lawyer, KBS Growth & Income REIT litigation options, KBS Growth & Income REIT secondary market, KBS Growth & income REIT terminates offering, KBS Growth & Income REIT value, KBS Growth and Income REIT Investment losses, Vero Beach broker fraud attorney, Vero Beach FINRA attorney, Vero Beach investment fraud attorney, Vero Beach securities attorney, Vero Beach securities lawyer 
  » Current Investigations » KBS Growth & Income REIT Terminates Offering        







Connect with Us! 






Search WhiteSecuritiesLaw.com


Contact Us! Name *E-mail *Phone *Comment or Message *MessageSubmit










            
				(312) 238-9650 | Fax (312) 238-8950 | (772) 242-9330 | 205 W. Randolph St., Suite 1200, Chicago, Illinois (IL) | Miracle Mile Center. 595 21st Street, Suite 200. Vero Beach, Florida 32960

The information you obtain at this site is not, nor is it intended to be, legal advice. You should consult an attorney for individual advice regarding your own situation. You may reproduce materials available at this site for your own personal use and for non-commercial distribution. All copies must include this copyright statement. © 2015 by The White Law Group, LLC All rights reserved.                     
            
























Advisory Agreement Between Kbs Growth  Income Reit, Inc. And Kbs Capital Advisors Llc - Consulting Services Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Consulting Services Agreement     > ADVISORY AGREEMENT between KBS GROWTH  INCOME REIT, INC. and KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Advisory Agreement Between Kbs Growth  Income Reit, Inc. And Kbs Capital Advisors Llc
Consulting Services Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Consulting Services Agreement involves KBS GROWTH  INCOME REIT, INC. | GKP Holding LLC | KBS Capital Advisors LLC | KBS GROWTH  INCOME REIT, INC | Schreiber Investments, LLC. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: ADVISORY AGREEMENT between KBS GROWTH  INCOME REIT, INC. and KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC Governing Law: Delaware      Date: 5/12/2016 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










 

Exhibit
10.4

 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 

SECOND AMENDED AND
RESTATED
 
ADVISORY AGREEMENT
between
KBS GROWTH & INCOME REIT,
INC.
and
KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC

 


 


 


 


 

 April 28, 2016

 


 


 

 

 




  


 

TABLE OF CONTENTS
 














 




 




Page





 




 




 





ARTICLE 1 –
DEFINITIONS



1





ARTICLE 2 –
APPOINTMENT



9





ARTICLE 3 – DUTIES OF THE
ADVISOR



9






 



3.01 Organizational and Offering
Services



10






 



3.02 Acquisition
Services



10






 



3.03 Asset Management
Services



10






 



3.04 Stockholder
Services



13






 



3.05 Other Services



13





ARTICLE 4 – AUTHORITY OF
ADVISOR



13






 



4.01 General



13






 



4.02 Powers of the
Advisor



14






 



4.03 Approval by the
Board



14






 



4.04 Modification or Revocation of
Authority of Advisor



14





ARTICLE 5 – BANK
ACCOUNTS



14





ARTICLE 6 – RECORDS AND
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



14





ARTICLE 7 – LIMITATION ON
ACTIVITIES



15





ARTICLE 8 – FEES



15






 



8.01 Acquisition Fees



15






 



8.02 Origination Fees



16






 



8.03 Asset Management
Fees



17






 



8.04 Disposition Fees



17






 



8.05 Subscription Processing
Fee



18






 



8.06 Subordinated Share of Cash
Flows



18






 



8.07 Subordinated Incentive
Fee



18






 



8.08 Changes to Fee
Structure



19





ARTICLE 9 –
EXPENSES



19






 



9.01 General



19






 



9.02 Timing of and Limitations on
Reimbursements



20





ARTICLE 10 – VOTING
AGREEMENT



21





ARTICLE 11 – RELATIONSHIP OF
ADVISOR AND COMPANY, OTHER ACTIVITIES OF THE ADVISOR



21






 



11.01 Relationship



21






 



11.02 Time Commitment



22






 



11.03 Investment Opportunities and
Allocation



22





ARTICLE 12 – THE KBS
NAME



23





ARTICLE 13 – TERM AND
TERMINATION OF THE AGREEMENT



23






 



13.01 Term



23






 



13.02 Terminated by Either
Party



23






 



13.03 Payments on Termination and
Survival of Certain Rights and Obligations



23





ARTICLE 14 –
ASSIGNMENT



24





ARTICLE 15 – INDEMNIFICATION
AND LIMITATION OF LIABILITY



24






 



15.01 Indemnification



24






 



15.02 Limitation on
Indemnification



25






 


i




 


 















 



15.03 Limitation on Payment of
Expenses



25





ARTICLE 16 –
MISCELLANEOUS



25






 



16.01 Notices



25






 



16.02 Modification



26






 



16.03 Severability



26






 



16.04 Construction



26






 



16.05 Entire Agreement



26






 



16.06 Waiver



26






 



16.07 Gender



26






 



16.08 Titles Not to Affect
Interpretation



26






 



16.09 Counterparts



26





ARTICLE 17 –
ADVANCE



27





 

 


ii




  


 

ADVISORY AGREEMENT
This Advisory Agreement, dated as
of April 28, 2016 (the “ Agreement ”), is
between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation
(the “ Company ”), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC,
a Delaware limited liability company (the “ Advisor
”).
W I T N E S S E T H
WHEREAS, the Company and the
Advisor previously entered into the Amended and Restated Advisory
Agreement dated August 11, 2015 and amended at various times
thereafter (as amended, the “ Advisory Agreement
”);
WHEREAS, the Company expects to
commence the Public Offering in April 2016;
WHEREAS, in connection with the
commencement of the Public Offering by the Company, the Company and
the Advisor desire to amend and restate the Advisory Agreement to
provide certain limitations included in the Company’s Article
of Incorporation related to its commencement of the Public
Offering;
WHEREAS, the Company desires to
continue to avail itself of the knowledge, experience, sources of
information, advice, assistance and certain facilities available to
the Advisor and to have the Advisor undertake the duties and
responsibilities hereinafter set forth, on behalf of, and subject
to the supervision of, the board of directors of the Company (the
“ Board ”), all as provided herein;
and
WHEREAS, the Advisor is willing to
undertake to render such services, subject to the supervision of
the Board, on the terms and conditions hereinafter set
forth.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of
the foregoing and of the mutual covenants and agreements contained
herein, the parties hereto agree to amend and restate the Advisory
Agreement as follows:
ARTICLE 1
DEFINITIONS
The following defined terms used in
this Agreement shall have the meanings specified below:
“ Acquiror ”
shall have the meaning set forth in the definition of
“Merger” below.
“ Acquisition Expenses
” means any and all expenses, excluding the fees payable to
the Advisor pursuant to Section 8.01 and Section 8.02, incurred by
the Company, the Advisor or any Affiliate of either in connection
with the selection, acquisition or development of any property,
loan or other potential investment, whether or not acquired or
originated, as applicable, including, without limitation, legal
fees and expenses, travel and communication expenses, costs of
appraisals, nonrefundable option payments on properties or other
investments not acquired, accounting fees and expenses, title
insurance premiums and miscellaneous expenses related to the
selection, acquisition or development of any property, loan or
other potential investment.

 


1




 


 

“ Acquisition Fees
” means the fee payable to the Advisor pursuant to Section
8.01 plus all other fees and commissions, excluding Acquisition
Expenses, paid by any Person to any Person in connection with
making or investing in any Property or other Permitted Investment
or the purchase, development or construction of any Property by the
Company. Included in the computation of such fees or commissions
shall be any real estate commission, selection fee, Development
Fee, Construction Fee, nonrecurring management fee, loan fees or
points or any fee of a similar nature, however designated. Excluded
shall be Development Fees and Construction Fees paid to Persons not
Affiliated with the Advisor in connection with the actual
development and construction of a Property.
“ Advance ”
shall have the meaning set forth in Article 17.
“ Advisor ”
means (i) KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability
company, or (ii) any successor advisor to the Company.
“ Affiliate ” or
“ Affiliated ” An Affiliate of another Person
includes any of the following: (i) any Person directly or
indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with
such other Person; (ii) any Person directly or indirectly owning,
controlling, or holding with the power to vote 10% or more of the
outstanding voting securities of such other Person; (iii) any legal
entity for which such Person acts as an executive officer,
director, trustee, or general partner; (iv) any Person 10% or more
of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly
owned, controlled, or held, with power to vote, by such other
Person; and (v) any executive officer, director, trustee, or
general partner of such other Person. An entity shall not be deemed
to control or be under common control with an Advisor-sponsored
program unless (i) the entity owns 10% or more of the voting equity
interests of such program or (ii) a majority of the board of
directors (or equivalent governing body) of such program is
composed of Affiliates of the entity.
“ Appraised Value
” means the value according to an appraisal made by an
Independent Appraiser.
“ Articles of
Incorporation ” means the Articles of Incorporation of
the Company under Title 2 of the Corporations and Associations
Article of the Annotated Code of Maryland, as amended from time to
time.
“ Asset Management Fee
” shall have the meaning set forth in Section
8.03.
“ Average Invested
Assets ” means, for a specified period, the average of
the aggregate book value of the assets of the Company invested,
directly or indirectly, in Properties, Loans and other Permitted
Investments secured by real estate before reserves for depreciation
or bad debts or other similar non-cash reserves, computed by taking
the average of such values at the end of each month during such
period.
“ Average Issue Price
” means the weighted average price at which shares were
purchased in the primary portion of an Offering which shall be
calculated as of the end of the month preceding the date upon which
the calculation is being made.

 


2




 


 

“ Board of Directors
” or “ Board ” means the persons holding
such office, as of any particular time, under the Articles of
Incorporation of the Company, whether they be the Directors named
therein or additional or successor Directors.
“ Bylaws ” means
the bylaws of the Company, as amended from time to time.
“ Cash from Financings
” means the net cash proceeds realized by the Company from
the financing of Properties, Loans or other Permitted Investments
or from the refinancing of any Company indebtedness (after
deduction of all expenses incurred in connection
therewith).
“ Cash from Sales and
Settlements ” means the net cash proceeds realized by the
Company (i) from the sale, exchange or other disposition of any of
its assets or any portion thereof after deduction of all expenses
incurred in connection therewith and (ii) from the prepayment,
maturity, workout or other settlement of any Loan or Permitted
Investment or portion thereof after deduction of all expenses
incurred in connection therewith. In the case of a transaction
described in clause (i) (C) of the definition of “Sale”
and (i)(B) of the definition of “Settlement,” Cash from
Sales and Settlements means the proceeds of any such transaction
actually distributed to the Company from the Joint Venture or
partnership. Cash from Sales and Settlements shall not include Cash
from Financings.
 “ Cash from Sales,
Settlements and Financings ” means the total sum of Cash
from Sales and Settlements and Cash from Financings.
“ Code ” means
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, or
any successor statute thereto. Reference to any provision of the
Code shall mean such provision as in effect from time to time, as
the same may be amended, and any successor provision thereto, as
interpreted by any applicable regulations as in effect from time to
time.
“ Company ”
means KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a corporation organized
under the laws of the State of Maryland.
“ Competitive Real Estate
Commission ” means a real estate or brokerage commission
for the purchase or sale of property that is reasonable, customary,
and competitive in light of the size, type, and location of the
property.
“ Conflicts Committee
” shall have the meaning set forth in the Company’s
Articles of Incorporation.
“ Construction Fee
” means a fee or other remuneration for acting as general
contractor and/or construction manager to construct improvements,
supervise and coordinate projects or to provide major repairs or
rehabilitation on a Property.
“ Contract Sales Price
” means the purchase price to be paid in connection with the
sale of a Property, Loan or other Permitted Investment less any
concessions agreed to in connection with the sale which may include
but are not limited to credits for future building or tenant
improvements, credits for future free rent given to tenants,
credits for future lease up assumptions, or other future rental
concessions; or, in the case of a discounted payoff of a
Loan,

 


3




 


 


the total funds
received by the Company in connection with the payoff, less any
expenses related thereto.
“ Cost of Loans and other
Permitted Investments ” means the sum of the cost of all
Loans and Permitted Investments held, directly or indirectly, by
the Company or the Partnership, calculated each month on an ongoing
basis, and calculated as follows for each investment: the lesser of
(i) the amount actually paid or allocated to acquire, originate or
fund the Loan or Permitted Investment, including the fees and
expenses associated with the acquisition, origination or funding of
such Loan or Permitted Investment (but excluding any Acquisition
Fees or Origination Fees paid or payable to the Advisor or its
Affiliates under this Agreement), and (ii) the outstanding
principal amount of such Loan or Permitted Investment, including
the fees and expenses associated with the acquisition, origination
or funding of such Loan or Permitted Investment (but excluding any
Acquisition Fees or Origination Fees paid or payable to the Advisor
or its Affiliates under this Agreement), as of the time of
calculation. With respect to any Loan or Permitted Investment held
by the Company or the Partnership through a Joint Venture or
partnership of which it is, directly or indirectly, a co-venturer
or partner, such amount shall be the Company’s proportionate
share thereof. The Cost of Loans and other Permitted Investments
shall be reduced by any debt financing secured by, or attributable
to, such investments.
“ Cost of Real Estate
Investments ” means the sum of (i) with respect to
Properties wholly owned, directly or indirectly, by the Company,
the amount actually paid or allocated to the purchase of
Properties, including the fees and expenses associated with the
purchase of such Properties (but excluding any Acquisition Fees
paid or payable to the Advisor or its Affiliates under this
Agreement), plus budgeted capital improvement costs for the
development, construction or improvement of Properties once such
funds are disbursed pursuant to a final approved budget and (ii) in
the case of Properties owned by any Joint Venture or partnership in
which the Company or the Partnership is, directly or indirectly, a
co-venturer or a partner, the portion of the amount actually paid
or allocated to the purchase of Properties, including the fees and
expenses associated with the purchase of such Properties (but
excluding any Acquisition Fees paid or payable to the Advisor or
its Affiliates under this Agreement), plus budgeted capital
improvement costs for the development, construction or improvement
of Properties once such funds are disbursed pursuant to a final
approved budget, that is attributable to the Company’s
investment in the Joint Venture or partnership. The Cost of Real
Estate Investments shall be reduced by any debt financing secured
by, or attributable to, the Properties.
 “ Dealer Manager
” means (i) KBS Capital Markets Group LLC, a Delaware limited
liability company, or (ii) any successor dealer manager to the
Company.
“ Development Fee
” means a fee for the packaging of a Property, including
negotiating and approving plans, and undertaking to assist in
obtaining zoning and necessary variances and necessary financing
for the Property, either initially or at a later date.
“ Director ”
means a member of the Board of Directors of the Company.
“ Disposition Fee
” shall have the meaning set forth in Section
8.04.

 


4




 


 

“ Distributions
” means any distributions (which shall not include stock
dividends) of money or other property by the Company to owners of
Shares, including distributions that may constitute a return of
capital for federal income tax purposes.
“ Excess Proceeds
” shall have the meaning set forth in Article 17.
“ GAAP ” means
accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States.
“ Gross Investment
Amount ” means the amount calculated by multiplying the
total number of Shares purchased by Stockholders by the issue
price, reduced by the total number of shares repurchased by the
Company (excluding the number of shares issued as stock dividends
and subsequently repurchased by the Company) multiplied by the
Average Issue Price.
“ Gross Proceeds
” means the aggregate purchase price of all Shares sold for
the account of the Company through an Offering, without deduction
for Organization and Offering Expenses.
“ Independent
Appraiser ” means a person or entity with no material
current or prior business or personal relationship with the Advisor
or the Directors, who is engaged to a substantial extent in the
business of rendering opinions regarding the value of assets of the
type held by the Company, and who is a qualified appraiser of real
estate as determined by the Board. Membership in a nationally
recognized appraisal society such as the American Institute of Real
Estate Appraisers (“M.A.I.”) or the Society of Real
Estate Appraisers (“S.R.E.A.”) shall be conclusive
evidence of such qualification.
“ Joint Venture
” means any joint venture, limited liability company or other
Affiliate of the Company that owns, in whole or in part, on behalf
of the Company any Properties, Loans or other Permitted
Investments.
“ Listed ” or
“ Listing ” shall have the meaning set forth in
the Company’s Articles of Incorporation.
“ Loans ” means
mortgage loans and other types of debt financing investments made
by the Company or the Partnership, either directly or indirectly,
including through ownership interests in a Joint Venture or
partnership, and including, without limitation, mezzanine loans,
B-notes, bridge loans, convertible mortgages, wraparound mortgage
loans, construction mortgage loans, loans on leasehold interests,
and participations in such loans.
“ Market Value ”
shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.07(i).
“ Merger ” means
any business combination, merger, reorganization or share exchange
involving the Company or its subsidiaries into or with another
corporation or other legal person (the “ Acquiror
”) and as a result of such transaction, less than 51% of the
outstanding voting securities or other capital interests of the
surviving, resulting or acquiring corporation or other legal person
are owned in the aggregate by those who were Stockholders
immediately prior to such transaction (other than the Acquiror or
its Affiliates if they owned Shares immediately prior to such
transaction).

 


5




 


 

“ Merger Consideration
Amount ” means (i) in the case of a Merger in which the
consideration consists solely of cash, the total consideration to
be received by holders of Shares outstanding immediately prior to
the closing of the Merger, (ii) in the case of a Merger in which
the consideration consists of securities traded on a national
securities exchange, the product of (x) the number of shares of
such securities received by the Stockholders at the closing of the
Merger and (y) the market value of such securities, measured by
taking the average closing price or the average of the bid and
asked price, as the case may be, over a period of 30 consecutive
days during which such securities are traded, with such 30-day
period ending on the trading day prior to the closing date of the
Merger, (iii) in the case of a Merger in which the consideration
consist of securities that are not traded on a national securities
exchange, the aggregate the fair market value (as of the most
recent practicable date) of the securities to be received by the
Stockholders as estimated by an independent expert chosen by the
Board of Directors, and (iv) in the case of a Merger in which the
consideration is some combination of that described above, the sum
of clauses (i) through (iii), as applicable.

“ MFFO
” shall have the meaning set forth in Article 17.

“ MFFO
Surplus ” shall have the meaning set forth in Article
17.

“ NASAA
Guidelines ” means the NASAA Statement of Policy
Regarding Real Estate Investment Trusts as in effect on the date
hereof.

“ Net
Income ” means, for any period, the total revenues
applicable to such period, less the total expenses applicable to
such period excluding additions to reserves for depreciation, bad
debts or other similar non-cash reserves; provided, however, Net
Income for purposes of calculating total allowable Operating
Expenses (as defined herein) shall exclude the gain from the sale
of the Company’s assets.
“ Offering ”
means a Private Offering or Public Offering.
“ Operating Cash Flow
” means Operating Revenue Cash Flows minus the sum of (i)
Operating Expenses, (ii) all principal and interest payments on
indebtedness and other sums paid to lenders, (iii) the expenses of
raising capital such as Organization and Offering Expenses, legal,
audit, accounting, underwriting, brokerage, listing, registration,
and other fees, printing and other such expenses and tax incurred
in connection with the issuance, distribution, transfer,
registration and Listing of the Shares, (iv) taxes,
(v) incentive fees paid in compliance with Section IV.F. of
the NASAA Guidelines and (vi) Acquisition Fees, Origination
Fees, Acquisition Expenses, real estate commissions on the resale
of real property, and other expenses connected with the
acquisition, origination, disposition, and ownership of real estate
interests, loans or other property (other than commissions on the
sale of assets other than real property), such as the costs of
foreclosure, insurance premiums, legal services, maintenance,
repair and improvement of property.
“ Operating Expenses
” means all costs and expenses incurred by the Company, as
determined under GAAP, that in any way are related to the operation
of the Company or to Company business, including fees paid to the
Advisor, but excluding (i) the expenses of raising capital such as
Organization and Offering Expenses, legal, audit, accounting,
underwriting, brokerage, listing, registration, and other fees,
printing and other such expenses and tax incurred

 


6




 


 


in connection with the
issuance, distribution, transfer, registration and Listing of the
Shares, (ii) interest payments, (iii) taxes, (iv) non-cash
expenditures such as depreciation, amortization and bad loan
reserves, (v) incentive fees paid in compliance with Section IV.F.
of the NASAA Guidelines and (vi) Acquisition Fees, Origination
Fees, Acquisition Expenses, real estate commissions on the resale
of real property, and other expenses connected with the
acquisition, origination, disposition, and ownership of real estate
interests, loans or other property (other than commissions on the
sale of assets other than real property), such as the costs of
foreclosure, insurance premiums, legal services, maintenance,
repair and improvement of property.
“ Operating Revenue Cash
Flows ” means the Company’s cash flow from
ownership and/or operation of (i) Properties, (ii) Loans, (iii)
Permitted Investments, (iv) short-term investments, and (v)
interests in Properties, Loans and Permitted Investments owned by
any Joint Venture or any partnership in which the Company or the
Partnership is, directly or indirectly, a co-venturer or
partner.
“ Organization and
Offering Expenses ” means all expenses incurred by or on
behalf of the Company in connection with or in preparing the
Company for an Offering and including, to the extent applicable,
the qualification, registration and regulatory filings of the
Offering and the marketing and distribution of the Shares, whether
incurred before or after the date of this Agreement, which may
include but are not limited to, total underwriting and brokerage
discounts and commissions (including fees of the
underwriters’ attorneys); any expense allowance granted by
the Company to the underwriter or any reimbursement of expenses of
the underwriter by the Company; expenses for printing, engraving
and mailing; compensation of employees while engaged in sales
activity; charges of transfer agents, registrars, trustees, escrow
holders, depositaries and experts; and expenses of qualification of
the sale of the securities under Federal and State laws, including
taxes and fees, accountants’ and attorneys’
fees.
“ Origination Fees
” means the fee payable to the Advisor pursuant to Section
8.02 plus all other fees and commissions, excluding Acquisition
Expenses, paid by any Person to any Person in connection with
making or investing in any Loan by the Company.
“ Partnership ”
means KBS Growth & Income Limited Partnership, a Delaware
limited partnership formed to own and operate Properties, Loans and
other Permitted Investments on behalf of the Company.
“ Permitted
Investments ” means all investments (other than
Properties, Loans and short-term investments acquired for purposes
of cash management) in which the Company may acquire an interest,
either directly or indirectly, including through ownership
interests in a Joint Venture or partnership, pursuant to its
Articles of Incorporation, Bylaws and the investment objectives and
policies adopted by the Board from time to time.
“ Person ” means
an individual, corporation, partnership, estate, trust (including a
trust qualified under Section 401(a) or 501(c) (17) of the Code), a
portion of a trust permanently set aside for or to be used
exclusively for the purposes described in Section 642(c) of the
Code, association, private foundation within the meaning of Section
509(a) of the Code, joint stock company or other entity, or any
government or any agency or political subdivision thereof, and also
includes a group as that term is used for purposes of Section
13(d)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended.

 


7




 


 

“ Private Offering
” means an offering of Shares pursuant to an exemption from
registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended.
“ Property ” or
“ Properties ” means any real property or
properties transferred or conveyed to the Company or the
Partnership, either directly or indirectly, and/or any real
property or properties transferred or conveyed to a Joint Venture
or partnership in which the Company is, directly or indirectly, a
co-venturer or partner.
“ Property Manager
” means an entity that has been retained to perform and carry
out, at one or more of the Properties, property-management
services, excluding persons, entities or independent contractors
retained or hired to perform facility management or other services
or tasks at a particular Property, the costs for which are passed
through to and ultimately paid by the tenant at such
Property.
“ Public Offering
” means the public offering of Shares pursuant to the
effective Registration Statement filed under the Securities Act of
1933 (file no. 333-207471), as amended.
“ REIT ” means a
“real estate investment trust” under Sections 856
through 860 of the Code.
“ Sale ” means
any transaction or series of related transactions whereby: (A) the
Company or the Partnership sells, grants, transfers, conveys, or
relinquishes its ownership of any Property, Loan or other Permitted
Investment or portion thereof, including the transfer of any
Property that is the subject of a ground lease, and including any
event with respect to any Property, Loan or other Permitted
Investment that gives rise to a significant amount of insurance
proceeds or condemnation awards, and including the issuance by one
of the Company’s subsidiaries of any asset-backed securities
as part of a securitization transaction; (B) the Company or the
Partnership sells, grants, transfers, conveys, or relinquishes its
ownership of all or substantially all of the interest of the
Company or the Partnership in any Joint Venture or partnership in
which it is, directly or indirectly, a co-venturer or partner; or
(C) any Joint Venture or partnership (in which the Company or the
Partnership is, directly or indirectly, a co-venturer or partner)
sells, grants, transfers, conveys, or relinquishes its ownership of
any Property, Loan or other Permitted Investment or portion
thereof, including any event with respect to any Property, Loan or
other Permitted Investment that gives rise to insurance claims or
condemnation awards, and including the issuance by such Joint
Venture or partnership or one of its subsidiaries of any
asset-backed securities as part of a securitization
transaction.
“ SEC ” means
the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
“ Settlement ”
means the prepayment, maturity, workout or other settlement of any
Loan or other Permitted Investment or portion thereof owned,
directly or indirectly, by (A) the Company or the Partnership or
(B) any Joint Venture or any partnership in which the Company or
the Partnership is, directly or indirectly, a partner.
“ Shares ” means
the shares of common stock of the Company, par value $.01 per
share.
“ Stockholders ”
means the registered holders of the Shares.

 


8




 


 

“ Stockholders’ 6%
Return ” means, as of any date, an aggregate amount equal
to a 6% cumulative, non-compounded, annual return on Gross
Investment Amount (calculated like simple interest on a daily basis
based on a three hundred sixty-five day year). For purposes of
calculating the Stockholders’ 6% Return, Gross Investment
Amount shall be determined for each day during the period for which
the Stockholders’ 6% Return is being calculated, including a
daily adjustment to reflect shares repurchased by the Company
(excluding shares issued as stock dividends and subsequently
repurchased by the Company), and shall be calculated net of (1)
Distributions of Cash from Sales and Settlements, (2) Distributions
of Operating Cash Flow to the extent such Distributions of
Operating Cash Flow provide a cumulative, non-compounded, annual
return in excess of 6%, as such amounts are computed on a daily
basis based on a three hundred sixty-five day year and (3)
Distributions of Cash from Financings, except to the extent such
Distributions would be required to supplement Distributions of
Operating Cash Flow in order to achieve a cumulative,
non-compounded, annual return of 6%, as such amounts are computed
on a daily basis based on a three hundred sixty-five day
year.
“ Subordinated Incentive
Fee ” means the fee payable to the Advisor under certain
circumstances, as calculated in Section 8.07.
“ Subordinated Performance
Fee Due Upon Termination ” means a fee payable in the
form of a promissory note (the “ Performance Fee Note
”) in a principal amount equal to (1) 15% of the amount, if
any, by which (a) the Appraised Value of the Company’s
Properties at the Termination Date, less amounts of all third-party
indebtedness secured by the Company’s Properties, plus the
fair market value of all other Loans and Permitted Investments of
the Company at the Termination Date, less amounts of third-party
indebtedness related to such Loans and Permitted Investments, plus
the fair market value of the Company’s other assets and
liabilities, plus total Distributions through the Termination Date
exceeds (b) the Gross Investment Amount plus total Distributions
required to be made to the stockholders in order to pay the
Stockholders’ 6% Return from inception through the
Termination Date. The Company shall repay the Performance Fee Note
at such time as the Company completes the first Sale or Settlement
after the Termination Date using Cash from Sales and Settlements.
If the Cash from Sales and Settlements from the first Sale or
Settlement after the Termination Date is insufficient to pay the
Performance Fee Note in full, then the Performance Fee Note shall
be paid in part from the Cash from Sales and Settlement from the
first Sale or Settlement, and in part from the Cash from Sales and
Settlements from each successive Sale or Settlement until the
Performance Fee Note is repaid in full. If the Performance Fee Note
has not been paid in full within five years from the Termination
Date, then the Advisor, its successors or assigns, may elect to
convert the balance of the fee into Shares at a price per Share
equal to the average closing price of the Shares over the ten
trading days immediately preceding the date of such election if the
Shares are Listed at such time. If the Shares are not Listed at
such time, the Advisor, its successors or assigns, may elect to
convert the balance of the fee into Shares at a price per Share
equal to the fair market value for the Shares as determined by the
Board of Directors based upon the Appraised Value of
Company’s Properties on the date of election plus the fair
market value of all other Loans and Permitted Investments of the
Company on the date of election.
“ Subordinated Share of
Cash Flows ” has the meaning set forth in Section
8.06.
“ Subscription Processing
Fee ” has the meaning set forth in Section
8.05.

 


9




 


 

“ Termination Date
” means the date of termination of the Agreement determined
in accordance with Article 12 hereof.
“ 2%/25% Guidelines
” means the requirement pursuant to the NASAA Guidelines
that, in any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters, total
Operating Expenses not exceed the greater of 2% of the
Company’s Average Invested Assets during such 12-month period
or 25% of the Company’s Net Income over the same 12-month
period.
ARTICLE 2
APPOINTMENT
The Company hereby appoints the
Advisor to serve as its advisor and asset manager on the terms and
conditions set forth in this Agreement, and the Advisor hereby
accepts such appointment.
ARTICLE 3
DUTIES OF THE ADVISOR
The Advisor is responsible for
managing, operating, directing and supervising the operations and
administration of the Company and its assets. The Advisor
undertakes to use its best efforts to present to the Company
potential investment opportunities, to make investment decisions on
behalf of the Company, subject to limitations in the
Company’s Articles of Incorporation, the direction and
oversight of the Board and Section 4.03 hereof, and to provide the
Company with a continuing and suitable investment program
consistent with the investment objectives and policies of the
Company as determined and adopted from time to time by the Board.
Subject to the limitations set forth in this Agreement, including
Article 4 hereof, and the continuing and exclusive authority of the
Board over the management of the Company, the Advisor shall, either
directly or by engaging an Affiliate or third party, perform the
following duties:
3.01     
Organizational and
Offering Services . The Advisor shall perform all
services related to the organization of the Company or any
Offering, other than services that (i) are to be performed by
the Dealer Manager, (ii) the Company elects to perform
directly or (iii) would require the Advisor to register as a
broker-dealer with the SEC or any state.
3.02     
Acquisition
Services .
(i)     
Serve as the
Company’s investment and financial advisor and provide
relevant market research and economic and statistical data in
connection with the Company’s assets and investment
objectives and policies;
(ii)     
Subject to Section 4
hereof and the investment objectives and policies of the Company:
(a) locate, analyze and select potential investments; (b) structure
and negotiate the terms and conditions of transactions pursuant to
which investments in Properties, Loans and other Permitted
Investments will be made; (c) acquire, originate and dispose of
Properties, Loans and other Permitted Investments on behalf of the
Company; (d) arrange for financing and refinancing and make other
changes in the asset or capital structure of investments in
Properties, Loans and other Permitted Investments;

 


10




 


 


and (e) enter into
leases, service contracts and other agreements for Properties,
Loans and other Permitted Investments;
(iii)     
Perform due diligence
on prospective investments and create due diligence reports
summarizing the results of such work;
(iv)     
Prepare reports
regarding prospective investments that include recommendations and
supporting documentation necessary for the Directors to evaluate
the proposed investments;
(v)     
Obtain reports (which
may be prepared by the Advisor or its Affiliates), where
appropriate, concerning the value of contemplated investments of
the Company;
(vi)     
Deliver to or maintain
on behalf of the Company copies of all appraisals obtained in
connection with the Company’s investments; and
(vii)     
Negotiate and execute
approved investments and other transactions, including prepayments,
maturities, workouts and other settlements of Loans and other
Permitted Investments.
3.03     
Asset Management
Services .
(i)     
Real Estate and Related
Services:
(a)     
Investigate, select
and, on behalf of the Company, engage and conduct business with
(including enter contracts with) such Persons as the Advisor deems
necessary to the proper performance of its obligations as set forth
in this Agreement, including but not limited to consultants,
accountants, lenders, technical advisors, attorneys, brokers,
underwriters, corporate fiduciaries, escrow agents, depositaries,
custodians, agents for collection, insurers, insurance agents,
developers, construction companies, Property Managers and any and
all Persons acting in any other capacity deemed by the Advisor
necessary or desirable for the performance of any of the foregoing
services;
(b)     
Negotiate and service
the Company’s debt facilities and other
financings;
(c)     
Monitor applicable
markets and obtain reports (which may be prepared by the Advisor or
its Affiliates) where appropriate, concerning the value of
investments of the Company;
(d)     
Monitor and evaluate
the performance of each asset of the Company and the
Company’s overall portfolio of assets, provide daily
management services to the Company and perform and supervise the
various management and operational functions related to the
Company’s investments;
(e)     
Formulate and oversee
the implementation of strategies for the administration, promotion,
management, operation, maintenance, improvement,

 


11




 


 


financing and
refinancing, marketing, leasing and disposition of Properties,
Loans and other Permitted Investments on an overall portfolio
basis;
(f)     
Consult with the
Company’s officers and the Board and assist the Board in the
formulation and implementation of the Company’s financial
policies, and, as necessary, furnish the Board with advice and
recommendations with respect to the making of investments
consistent with the investment objectives and policies of the
Company and in connection with any borrowings proposed to be
undertaken by the Company;
(g)     
Oversee the performance
by the Property Managers of their duties, including collection and
proper deposits of rental payments and payment of Property expenses
and maintenance;
(h)     
Conduct periodic
on-site property visits to some or all (as the Advisor deems
reasonably necessary) of the Properties to inspect the physical
condition of the Properties and to evaluate the performance of the
Property Managers;
(i)     
Review, analyze and
comment upon the operating budgets, capital budgets and leasing
plans prepared and submitted by each Property Manager and aggregate
these property budgets into the Company’s overall
budget;
(j)     
Coordinate and manage
relationships between the Company and any co-venturers or partners;
and
(k)     
Consult with the
Company’s officers and the Board and provide assistance with
the evaluation and approval of potential asset dispositions, sales
and refinancings.
(ii)     
Accounting and Other
Administrative Services:
(a)     
Provide the day-to-day
management of the Company and perform and


 








 





















    CFX Markets | Sell Your REITs 	
















Sell Your REITs
Welcome REIT investors

 



Welcome to CFX Markets! We provide a trading platform for alternative assets, including public non-listed REITs and Limited Partnerships. We bring the option of liquidity to the millions of investors who invest nationwide in the alternative investments industry. Our secure online platform makes it easy and efficient to sell your asset. We provide transparent pricing and ready access to information to enable sellers to make informed decisions as they seek liquiity for their portfolio.
 



CFX Markets give investors a chance to sell their alternative assets, giving more power to the investor.

 

  

Interested in selling your Alternative Investment?
We work with all major REITs including: American Realty Capital  Behringer Harvard  CNL Lifestyle Properties REIT Griffin Capital  Hines Real Estate  Highlands  InvenTrust Properties Corporation  KBS-CMG Real Estate  Resource Real Estate

 

Get Started Online

Call our Trading Desk toll free at 888-925-4888

 


Reasons sellers seek liquidity options
There are many reasons that a Seller seeks liquidity, but the “FOUR Ds” illustrate most of the reasons that investors are looking to the Secondary Market to sell their non-listed Alternative Assets.
Death
CFX handles all aspects of liquidating Alternative Investments held in Estates.  Ask us about our Valuation Services.
Divorce
CFX works with attorneys and representatives from both sides to help create a liquidity event that is satisfactory to all the involved parties.
Debt
CFX understands that many Sellers are looking for cash due to unforeseen financial reasons.  Liquidation of an Alternative Asset is often the only option.
Disillusionment
Some investors are just “DONE” waiting for K-1s or other tax information and would just prefer to liquidate their asset. Others may find they want to invest their money into other asset classes or find a better price than a mini-tender offer.  Whatever reason you may have for selling your non-listed REITs and LPs, the problems are the same: The market is fragmented and inefficient and the transfer process is complicated.

 SELL YOUR REIT OR LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
 
CFX Markets is committed to assisting Sellers solving their liquidity needs and overcome the market inefficiencies and the complicated transfer process that follows.  Our on-line platform is designed to streamline the document execution process and reduce the time it takes to release proceeds to the Seller.
 
Call our Trading Desk toll free at 888-925-4888
 to see how CFX Markets can assist you with your alternative asset. 


 

Get Started Online








CFX Markets

The secondary market for alternative assets - bringing access and liquidity to investors.



Company

About
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Contact



Learn

Research
Education
FAQ




Contact


Corporate

(888) 925-4888

info@cfxtrading.com

Trading Desk

(888) 925-4888 Ext. 2

trading@cfxtrading.com











				CFX Markets is a website operated by CFX Direct, LLC. Securities are offered through Sageworks Capital, Inc., an affiliated entity, and a registered broker-dealer and member FINRA/SIPC. Neither CFX Direct nor Sageworks Capital provide any investment advice or make any investment recommendations to any persons, ever, and no communication through this website or in any other medium should be construed as such. By accessing this site and any pages thereof, you agree to be bound by our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.  CFX Markets is intended only for asset shareholders or for accredited investor buyers (for persons residing in the U.S.), and for persons residing abroad in jurisdictions where securities registration exemptions apply.
				
				Assets listed on this website are securities that are not publicly traded, are subject to holding period requirements, and are intended for investors who do not need a liquid investment.  These investments are NOT bank deposits (and thus NOT insured by the FDIC or by any other federal governmental agency), are NOT guaranteed by CFX Direct, and MAY lose value.  Neither the Securities and Exchange Commission nor any federal or state securities commission or regulatory authority has recommended or approved any investment or the accuracy or completeness of any of the information or materials provided by or through the website.  Investors must be able to afford the loss of their entire investment.
				
				Any financial projections or returns shown on the website are illustrative examples only, and there can be no assurance that any valuations provided are accurate or in agreement with market or industry valuations.  Any investment information contained herein has been secured from sources CFX Direct believes are reliable, but we make no representations or warranties as to the accuracy of such information and accept no liability therefor.   Offers to sell, or the solicitations of offers to buy, any security can only be made through official offering documents that contain important information about risks, fees and expenses. Investors should conduct their own due diligence, not rely on the financial assumptions or estimates displayed on this website, and are encouraged to consult with a financial advisor, attorney, accountant, and any other professional that can help you to understand and assess the risks associated with any investment opportunity.  
				
				*Past performance is not indicative of future performance.
			





                    ÂŠ2014-2017 CFX Markets





















KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog














Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.




KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.





      Loading...
    









Sample Contracts



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
ADVISORY AGREEMENT Between KBS GROWTH & INCOME REIT, INC. And KBS CAPITAL
ADVISORS LLC
(April 27th, 2017)
This Advisory Agreement, dated as of April 27, 2017 (the "Agreement"), is between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "Advisor").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Agreement Regarding Payment of Certain Items of Compensation and Expenses
Related to the Offering of Class a Shares Through an Online Distribution
Channel
(April 27th, 2017)
This agreement dated as of April 27, 2017 (the "Agreement") is entered by and among KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "Advisor"), and KBS Capital Markets Group LLC, a California limited liability company (the "Dealer Manager").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Fourth Amendment to Lease Agreement
(March 9th, 2017)
THIS FOURTH AMENDMENT TO LEASE AGREEMENT (this "Fourth Amendment") is entered into effective April  30 , 2016, by and between Greenhouse Office Investors I, LLC ("Landlord"), and AECOM ("Tenant").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Second Amendment to Lease Agreement
(March 9th, 2017)
WHEREAS, pursuant to that certain Office Lease dated as of May 23, 2013 as amended by First Amendment thereto dated September 13, 2013 (together the "Lease"), Landlord leased to Tenant a total of 136,358 Rentable Square Feet ("RSF") in the building located at 18918 Katy Freeway, Harris County, Texas (the "Building"), of  which approximately  126,795 RSF is located on Floors 3, 4 and 5  of



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Third Amendment to Lease Agreement
(March 9th, 2017)
THIS THIRD AMENDMENT TO LEASE AGREEMENT (this "Third Amendment") is entered into effective November 24, 2014, by and between Greenhouse Office Investors I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord"), and URS Corporation, a Nevada corporation ("Tenant").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Office Lease Between
(March 9th, 2017)
This Office Lease (this "Lease") is entered into by and between Greenhouse Office Investors I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord''), and URS Corporation, a Nevada corporation ("Tenant'), and shall be effective as of the date set forth below Landlord's signature (the "Effective Date").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Commencement Letter to Fourth Amendment
(March 9th, 2017)
Fourth Amendment to Lease Agreement dated April 30, 2016 (the "Lease") , between Greenhouse Office Investors I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord") and AECOM ("Tenant") for the File Storage Premises, the Rentable Square Footage of which is approximately 5,195, located on floor 1 (Suite 160) of the Building. Unless otherwise specified, all capitalized terms used herein shall have the same meaning as in the Lease.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
First Amendment to Lease Agreement
(March 9th, 2017)
THIS FIRST AMENDMENT TO   LEASE   AGREEMENT   (this "First Amendment" is entered into effective September 13, 2013, by and between Greenhouse Office Investors I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord"), and URS Corporation, a Nevada corporation ("Tenant").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Commencement Letter
(March 9th, 2017)
Office Lease dated May 23, 2013 (the "Lease"), between Greenhouse Office Investors I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord") and URS Corporation, a Nevada corporation ("Tenant") for the Premises, the Rentable Square Footage of which is approximately 135,727 located on floors 1, 3, 4, and 5 of the Building. Unless otherwise specified, all capitalized terms used herein shall have the same meaning as in the Lease.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Term Loan and Security Agreement
(December 20th, 2016)
Outstanding Principal Balance May Not Exceed the Availability Amount; Revolving Portion May Be Repaid and Re-Borrowed



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Second Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(December 20th, 2016)
This amendment no. 2 to the Second Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement dated as of April 28, 2016 and amended on June 28, 2016 (as amended, the "Advisory Agreement"), between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "Advisor"), is entered as of November 9, 2016 (the "Amendment"). Capitalized terms used herein but not defined shall have the meaning set forth in the Advisory Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Guaranty
(December 20th, 2016)
THIS GUARANTY ("Guaranty") is executed as of November 14, 2016, by KBSGI  REIT PROPERTIES, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Guarantor"), for the benefit of JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the "Lenders" pursuant to the Loan Agreement described below (in such capacity, "Administrative Agent") and in favor of each party that now or hereafter is bound under the Loan Agreement as a "Lender" (referred to herein individually as a "Lender" and collectively as the "Lenders").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Real Estate Property Co-Management Agreement
(December 20th, 2016)
This Real Estate Property Co-Management Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of November 21, 2016, between KBSGI OFFICES AT GREENHOUSE, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Owner") acting through KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Owner's Representative") and KBS MANAGEMENT GROUP, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Co-Manager") with reference to the following facts:



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Promissory Note
(December 20th, 2016)
This Note is one of the Notes issued pursuant to, and is entitled to the benefits of, the Term Loan and Security Agreement of even date herewith (which, as it may be amended or modified and in effect from time to time, is herein called the "Agreement"), among Offices at Greenhouse Borrower, each other Borrower from time to time a party thereto, the lenders referenced therein, including Lender, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, to which Agreement reference is hereby made for a statement of the terms and conditions governing this Note, including the terms and conditions under which this Note may be prepaid or its maturity date accelerated.  This Note is secured and guaranteed pursuant to the Loan Documents, all as more specifically described in the Agreement, and reference is made thereto for a statement of the terms and provisions thereof.  Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein are used with the meanings attributed to them in the Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
DEED OF TRUST, SECURITY AGREEMENT, ASSIGNMENT OF LEASES AND RENTS AND FIXTURE
FILING (Offices at Greenhouse) From KBSGI OFFICES AT GREENHOUSE, LLC, a
Delaware Limited Liability Company, as Grantor to RANDY DURANT as Trustee for
the Benefit of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent as
Beneficiary
(December 20th, 2016)
THIS DEED OF TRUST, SECURITY AGREEMENT, ASSIGNMENT OF LEASES AND RENTS AND FIXTURE FILING (this "Deed of Trust"), is made as of November 14, 2016, by KBSGI OFFICES AT GREENHOUSE, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Trustor"), as trustor, in favor of RANDY DURANT, an individual ("Trustee"), as trustee, for the benefit of JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a national banking association, as "Administrative Agent" as described below (in such capacity, together with its successors and assigns, hereinafter called "Beneficiary"), as beneficiary.  Beneficiary is acting as the administrative agent for itself and all other "Lenders" now or hereafter existing under that certain Loan Agreement (defined below).



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Assignment and Assumption of Contract of Purchase and Sale
(September 27th, 2016)
This Assignment and Assumption of Contract of Purchase and Sale ("Assignment") is entered into between KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignor"), and KBSGI OFFICES AT GREENHOUSE, LLC , a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignee"), as of September 21, 2016 ("Effective Date").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
CONTRACT OF PURCHASE AND SALE BETWEEN KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC, PURCHASER AND
GREENHOUSE OFFICE INVESTORS I, LLC, SELLER September 19, 2016
(September 27th, 2016)
THIS CONTRACT OF PURCHASE AND SALE (this "Agreement") is made and entered into as of September 19, 2016 (the "Effective Date"), by and between GREENHOUSE OFFICE INVESTORS I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company having an address c/o JP Morgan Investment Management Inc., 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017 ("Seller") and KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, having an address at 800 Newport Center Drive, Suite 700, Newport Beach, California 92660 ("Purchaser").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Guaranty of Recourse Obligations
(August 11th, 2016)
This GUARANTY OF RECOURSE OBLIGATIONS ("Guaranty") is executed as of June 30, 2016, by KBSGI REIT PROPERTIES, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Guarantor"), in favor of METROPOLITAN LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY, a New York corporation ("Lender"), with reference to the following facts:



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Promissory Note Defined Terms
(August 11th, 2016)
Loan Amount:    Up to $47,400,000.00 of which (x) $41,000,000.00 ("Initial Loan Amount") shall be disbursed to Borrower on the Initial Loan Amount Funding Date and (y) up to $6,400,000.00 ("Maximum Loan Amount") shall be disbursed as, when, and to the extent expressly provided in Section 12 of the Note.  [Note: Assumes full disbursement of Initial Loan Amount and will be modified as necessary]



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
LINE OF CREDIT INSTRUMENT DEED OF TRUST, ASSIGNMENT OF LEASES AND RENTS,
SECURITY AGREEMENT, AND FIXTURE FILING BY KBSGI 421 SW 6TH AVENUE, LLC, a
Delaware Limited Liability Company, as Trustor TO CHICAGO TITLE INSURANCE
COMPANY, a Nebraska Corporation, as Trustee for the Benefit of METROPOLITAN
LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY, a New York Corporation, as Beneficiary June 30, 2016
(August 11th, 2016)
THIS DEED OF TRUST, ASSIGNMENT OF LEASES AND RENTS, SECURITY AGREEMENT AND FIXTURE FILING (together with all extensions, renewals, modifications, restatements and amendments hereof, this "Deed of Trust") is entered into as of the Execution Date by Trustor, as grantor, to Trustee, as trustee, for the benefit of Beneficiary, as beneficiary, with reference to the following Recitals:



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Second Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(August 11th, 2016)
This amendment no. 1 to the Second Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement dated as of April 28, 2016 (the "Advisory Agreement"), between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "Advisor"), is entered into as of June 28, 2016 (the "Amendment").  Capitalized terms used herein but not defined shall have the meaning set forth in the Advisory Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (Commonwealth Building, Portland, Oregon)
(August 11th, 2016)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT ("Agreement"), dated for reference purposes as of May 6, 2016, is made by and between UPI COMMONWEALTH LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Seller"), and KBSGI 421 SW 6TH AVENUE, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Purchaser").  As used herein, "Effective Date" means the date of mutual execution of this Agreement established by the dates shown below each of the signatures of Seller and Purchaser.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Real Estate Property Co-Management Agreement
(August 11th, 2016)
This Real Estate Property Co-Management Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of June 18, 2016, between KBSGI 421 SW 6th AVENUE, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Owner") acting through KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Owner's Representative") and KBS MANAGEMENT GROUP, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Co-Manager") with reference to the following facts:



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
ADVISORY AGREEMENT Between KBS GROWTH & INCOME REIT, INC. And KBS CAPITAL
ADVISORS LLC
(May 12th, 2016)
This Advisory Agreement, dated as of April 28, 2016 (the "Agreement"), is between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "Advisor").



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
KBS GROWTH & INCOME REIT, INC. MULTIPLE CLASS PLAN Effective as of April 11,
2016
(April 20th, 2016)
As permitted by Section 5.4 of KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.s (the Corporation) Second Articles of Amendment and Restatement (Charter) and required by the Articles Supplementary designating the Class T Common Stock of the Corporation (the Articles), effective as of the date set forth above, the Corporations board of directors (the Board) adopts this Multiple Class Plan (the Plan) to establish certain features of the Class A Common Stock and the Class T Common Stock. Each capitalized term in this Plan not otherwise defined herein has the same meaning as that set forth in the Charter or the Articles, as appropriate.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Real Estate Property Co-Management Agreement
(March 25th, 2016)
This Real Estate Property Co-Management Agreement (Agreement) is made as of March 9, 2016, between KBSGI VON KARMAN TECH, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Owner) acting through KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Owners Representative) and KBS MANAGEMENT GROUP, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Co-Manager) with reference to the following facts:



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Amended and Restated Escrow Agreement
(March 25th, 2016)
THIS AMENDED AND RESTATED ESCROW AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is made and entered into as of this 18th day of March, 2016 by and among KBS Capital Markets Group, LLC, a California limited liability company (the Dealer Manager), KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), and UMB Bank, N.A., as escrow agent, a national banking association organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America (the Escrow Agent).



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
KBS GROWTH & INCOME REIT, INC. FORM OF MULTIPLE CLASS PLAN Effective as of ,
2016
(March 25th, 2016)
As permitted by Section 5.4 of KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc.s (the Corporation) Second Articles of Amendment and Restatement (Charter) and required by the Articles Supplementary designating the Class T Common Stock of the Corporation (the Articles), effective as of the date set forth above, the Corporations board of directors (the Board) adopts this Multiple Class Plan (the Plan) to establish certain features of the Class A Common Stock and the Class T Common Stock. Each capitalized term in this Plan not otherwise defined herein has the same meaning as that set forth in the Charter or the Articles, as appropriate.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Amendment No. 5 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(March 25th, 2016)
This amendment no. 5 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement dated as of August 11, 2015 (the Advisory Agreement), between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor), is entered into as of March 16, 2016 (the Amendment). Capitalized terms used herein but not defined shall have the meaning set forth in the Advisory Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
FORM OF SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT Between KBS GROWTH &
INCOME REIT, INC. And KBS CAPITAL ADVISORS LLC April , 2016
(March 25th, 2016)
This Advisory Agreement, dated as of April     , 2016 (the Agreement), is between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor).



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Amendment No. 2 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(February 16th, 2016)
This amendment no. 2 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement dated as of August 11, 2015 (the Advisory Agreement), between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor), is entered into as of October 26, 2015 (the Amendment). Capitalized terms used herein but not defined shall have the meaning set forth in the Advisory Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Amendment No. 3 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(February 16th, 2016)
This amendment no. 3 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement dated as of August 11, 2015 (the Advisory Agreement), between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor), is entered into as of November 30, 2015 (the Amendment). Capitalized terms used herein but not defined shall have the meaning set forth in the Advisory Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Amendment No. 4 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(February 16th, 2016)
This amendment no. 4 to the Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement dated as of August 11, 2015 (the Advisory Agreement), between KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor), is entered into as of January 26, 2016 (the Amendment). Capitalized terms used herein but not defined shall have the meaning set forth in the Advisory Agreement.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Promissory Note
(October 16th, 2015)
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, KBS Growth & Income Limited Partnership (the Borrower) promises to pay to the order of KBS Capital Advisors LLC, its successors and assigns (the Lender) the principal sum of $2,630,100, together with interest on the unpaid principal, calculated as set forth in Section 2 below.



KBS Growth & Income REIT, Inc. –
Third Amendment to Agreement of Sale and Purchase
(October 16th, 2015)
THIS THIRD AMENDMENT TO AGREEMENT OF SALE AND PURCHASE (this Third Amendment) is made as of the 17th day of July, 2015, by and between HB Von Karman, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Seller), and KBS Capital Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Buyer). In consideration of the mutual promises and covenants contained herein, the parties hereto agree as follows:













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.














Consulting Contract / Sample Library

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Consulting Services Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>





Consulting service agreements are documents used when an individual or company hires an outside consultant for their expertise. Consultants work in multiple fields including the medical, engineering and human resources fields, and present expert opinions on the current conditions of their client's business.The contracts define the scope of the work the consultant will perform and outline the terms of their payment. These agreements also cover the method of payment and the estimated time for the project. Consulting service agreements may contain clauses that outline terms and conditions regarding the consultation, and will make the parties aware of any repercussions that may arise due to breach of contract.There are several varieties of consulting work, and a contract may contain language specific to a certain type. Contracts may include clauses regarding ownership of the work product, such as reports and case studies. Using a consultant services agreement helps a consultant see what the client expects.        



Consulting Contract Document Library - Actual Legal Contract Samples 





	This Consulting Contract sample library contains actual legal documents drafted
by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive
intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about
transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions
of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) Results Indicate Stockholders Overwhelmingly Approved New Investment Advisory AgreementParties: FIFTH STREET FINANCE CORP. | Fifth Street Finance Corp | Fifth Street Management LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/21/2017

2) TECNOGLASS ANNOUNCES ACQUISTION OF WINDOW AND DOOR DESIGN AND INSTALLATION COMPANY IN THE UNITED STATESParties: TECNOGLASS INC. | Giovanni Monti and Partners Consulting | Glazing Contractors, Inc | Tecnoglass, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/7/2017

3) Quantum Corporation and VIEX Capital Advisors Sign Agreement to Reconstitute Quantum Board to Consist of a Majority of New DirectorsParties: QUANTUM CORP /DE/ | Quantum Corp | VIEX Capital Advisors, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/3/2017

4) First Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Andalusia Professional Services, LLCParties: ATHENS PHYSICIANS PRACTICE, LLC | Andalusia Professional Services, LLC | LifePoint Holdings 2, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
5) First Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Andalusia Professional Services, LLCParties: COMMUNITY MEDICAL LLC | Andalusia Professional Services, LLC | LifePoint Holdings 2, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
6) First Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Andalusia Professional Services, LLCParties: DLP PARTNER FRYE, LLC | Andalusia Professional Services, LLC | LifePoint Holdings 2, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
7) First Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Andalusia Professional Services, LLCParties: AMG LOGAN LLC | Andalusia Professional Services, LLC | LifePoint Holdings 2, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
8) First Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Andalusia Professional Services, LLCParties: LIFEPOINT CSLP LLC | Andalusia Professional Services, LLC | LifePoint Holdings 2, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) Director Services AgreementParties: NEXEON MEDSYSTEMS INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

10) SHARED SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: MACK CALI REALTY CORP | Mack-Cali Realty, LP | Mack-Cali Texas Property, LP | MCRLP, Mack-Cali Realty Corporation | Roseland Residential Holding LLC | Roseland Residential, LP | RPIIA-RLA, LLC | RPIIA-RLB, LLC 
								Law Firm: Seyfarth Shaw
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
11) CONSULTING AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE OF CLAIMSParties: ARCBEST CORP /DE/ | ArcBest Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Arkansas
12) RETIREMENT AND CONSULTING AGREEMENTParties: CEMPRA, INC. | Authorized Member, Board | Cempra, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:North Carolina
13) CONSULTANT AGREEMENTParties: PHI INC | PHI, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

14) CONSULTING AGREEMENTParties: CELSIUS HOLDINGS, INC. | Celsius Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Florida
15) BOARD OF DIRECTORS SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: HELPFUL ALLIANCE CO | Helpful Alliance Company 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Florida
16) First Amendment To 2012 Broadcast Services Agreement Between EchoStar Broadcasting Corporation and DISH Network L.L.CParties: ECHOSTAR CORP | 2012 Broadcast Services | DISH Network LLC | EchoStar Broadcasting Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

17) FIRST AMENDMENT TO TRANSPORATION SERVICES AGREEMENT - TEXAS CITY TO PASADENAParties: MPLX LP | Marathon Petroleum Company LP | Marathon Pipe Line LLC | MPC Investment LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

18) TREGARON ? ENDURANCE MASTER SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: ENDURANCE INTERNATIONAL GROUP HOLDINGS, INC. | Endurance International Group, Inc | Endurance Web Solutions Private Limited | Glowtouch Technologies Private Limited | Tregaron India Holdings, LLC | WHICH ARE INCORPORATED 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Massachusetts
19) FIRST AMENDMENT TO AMENDED AND RESTATED MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: MPLX LP | Hardin Street Marine LLC | Marathon Petroleum Company LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

20) FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED GLOBAL MASTER SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: DUN  BRADSTREET CORP/NW | Acxiom Corporation | DUN  BRADSTREET, INC | ENSONO, LP | Global Master Services 
								Law Firm: Pillsbury Winthrop
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
21) INTERCOMPANY SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: RIVERSOURCE LIFE INSURANCE CO | 227 Ameriprise Financial | Ameriprise India Private Limited | RIVERSOURCE LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Minnesota
22) CONSULTING AGREEMENTParties: L3 TECHNOLOGIES, INC. | L3 Technologies, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
23) Manufacturing Services AgreementParties: CLOVIS ONCOLOGY, INC. | Associate Director, Key Account Management | Clovis Oncology Inc | Lonza Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

24) TURNKEY ENGINEERING, PROCUREMENT AND CONSTRUCTION SERVICES AGREEMENT (MERRICOURT WIND PROJECT)Parties: OTTER TAIL CORP | EDF RENEWABLE DEVELOPMENT, INC | EDF-RE US DEVELOPMENT, LLC | OTTER TAIL POWER COMPANY | Turnkey Engineering, Procurement and Construction Services 
								
								Document Date: 2/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
25) EXPORTER SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: AMERICATOWNE INC. | AmericaTowne, Inc | Ijeoma Ubezonu, Co 
								
								Document Date: 2/22/2017

26) STORAGE SERVICES AGREEMENT between PBFX OPERATING COMPANY LLC and PBF HOLDING COMPANY LLCParties: PBF ENERGY INC. | PBF Holding Company LLC | PBFX Operating Company LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
27) STORAGE SERVICES AGREEMENT between PBFX OPERATING COMPANY LLC and PBF HOLDING COMPANY LLCParties: PBF LOGISTICS LP | PBF Holding Company LLC | PBFX Operating Company LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/16/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
28) MANAGEMENT CONSULTANT AGREEMENTParties: KINETIC GROUP INC. | Kinetic Group Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Nevada
29) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO ADVISORY AGREEMENTParties: CNL HEALTHCARE PROPERTIES II, INC. | CHP II Advisors, LLC | CHP II GP, LLC | CHP II Partners, LP | CNL Healthcare Properties II, Inc | CNL Securities Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Florida
30) JILL ACQUISITION LLC TOWERBROOK CAPITAL PARTNERS L.P. SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: J.JILL, INC. | Jill Acquisition LLC | TowerBrook Capital Partners LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
31) SEPARATION AND CONSULTING SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: VALERITAS HOLDINGS INC. | SEPARATION AND CONSULTING SERVICES | Valeritas, Inc 
								Law Firm: Morgan Lewis
								Document Date: 2/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New Jersey
32) TRANSITION SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: BIOVERATIV INC. | BIOGEN INC | Bioverativ Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/2/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
33) TRANSITION SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: LOGMEIN, INC. | Citrix Group | CITRIX SYSTEMS ASIA PACIFIC PTY LTD | CITRIX SYSTEMS IRELAND LTD | CITRIX SYSTEMS NETHERLANDS BV | CITRIX SYSTEMS UK LTD | Citrix Systems, Inc | Citrix, SpinCo and LogMeIn, Inc | GETGO AUS PTY LTD | GETGO TECHNOLOGIES IRELAND LIMITED | GETGO TECHNOLOGIES UK LIMITED | GetGo, Inc | SpinCo Group 
								Law Firm: Latham Watkins;Skadden Arps
								Document Date: 2/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
34) CONSULTING AGREEMENTParties: PROBILITY MEDIA CORP | Panther Biotechnology, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
35) TRANSITION SERVICES AGREEMENT BY AND BETWEEN VARIAN MEDICAL SYSTEMS, INC. AND VAREX IMAGING CORPORATION DATED AS OF JANUARY 27, 2017Parties: VAREX IMAGING CORP | Varex Imaging Corporation | VARIAN MEDICAL SYSTEMS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 1/30/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
36) TRANSITION SERVICES AGREEMENT BY AND BETWEEN VARIAN MEDICAL SYSTEMS, INC. AND VAREX IMAGING CORPORATION DATED AS OF JANUARY 27, 2017 TABLE OF CONTENTSParties: VARIAN MEDICAL SYSTEMS INC | Varex Imaging Corporation | VARIAN MEDICAL SYSTEMS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 1/30/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
37) FIRST AMENDMENT TO TRANSITION SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: ICTV BRANDS INC. | ICTV Holdings, Inc | PhotoMedex, Inc | PhotoTherapeutics Ltd | Radiancy (Israel) Limited | Radiancy, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
38) FORM OF AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT between HARTMAN VREIT XXI, INC.Parties: HARTMAN VREIT XXI, INC. | Hartman Advisors, LLC | Hartman vREIT XXI, Inc | Hartman XXI Advisors, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
39) FORM OF AMENDED AND RESTATED MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: NEXTERA ENERGY PARTNERS, LP | ANEE Partners | BThe NEP Parties | NEE Operating LP | NextEra Energy Management Partners GP, LLC | NextEra Energy Management Partners, LP | NEXTERA ENERGY OPERATING PARTNERS GP, LLC | NEXTERA ENERGY OPERATING PARTNERS, LP | NextEra Energy Partners GP, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
40) Consulting AgreementParties: REALBIZ MEDIA GROUP, INC 
								
								Document Date: 1/26/2017

41) FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME, INCParties: ASHFORD INC. | ASHFORD HOSPITALITY ADVISORS LLC | ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | Ashford Hospitality Prime TRS Corporation | ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME, INC | Ashford Inc | Ashford Prime OP General Partner LLC | ASHFORD PRIME TRS CORPORATION | Operating Partnership 
								
								Document Date: 1/25/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
42) FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME, INCParties: ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME, INC. | ASHFORD HOSPITALITY ADVISORS LLC | ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | Ashford Hospitality Prime TRS Corporation | ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME, INC | Ashford Inc | Ashford Prime OP General Partner LLC | ASHFORD PRIME TRS CORPORATION | Operating Partnership 
								
								Document Date: 1/25/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
43) ASHFORD PRIME ANNOUNCES AMENDMENT TO ADVISORY AGREEMENT Significantly Lowers Termination Fee and Addresses Other Investor FeedbackParties: ASHFORD HOSPITALITY PRIME, INC. | Ashford Hospitality Prime, Inc | Ashford Inc | Financial Relations Board 
								
								Document Date: 1/25/2017

44) FIRST AMENDMENT TO TRANSITION SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: PHOTOMEDEX INC | ICTV Holdings, Inc | PhotoMedex, Inc | PhotoTherapeutics Ltd | Radiancy (Israel) Limited | Radiancy, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
45) CONSULTING AGREEMENTParties: FIRST HAWAIIAN, INC. | Company's Bank | FIRST HAWAIIAN BANK | First Hawaiian, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Hawaii
46) AGREEMENT TERMINATING AND EXTINGUISHING CONSULTING AGREEMENT AND CONSULTING AND MARKETING AGREEMENTParties: GALENFEHA, INC. | Asher Oil  Gas Exploration, LLC | Galenfeha, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/23/2017

47) CONSULTING AGREEMENT AMENDMENTParties: PHARMA-BIO SERV, INC. | Pharma-Bio Serv, Inc | Strategic Consultants International, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017

48) EXPORTER SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: AMERICATOWNE INC. | AmericaTowne, Inc | Mai Dolfin Nig Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017

49) SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: USELL.COM, INC. | BST Distribution, Inc | HD CAPITAL HOLDINGS LLC | UPSTREAM PHONE COMPANY USA, INC | UPSTREAM PHONE HOLDINGS, INC | uSellcom, Inc | We Sell Cellular LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/19/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
50) CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENTParties: STEADFAST APARTMENT REIT III, INC. | CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT SERVICES | PACIFIC COAST LAND  CONSTRUCTION, INC | STAR III SWEETWATER, LLC | Steadfast Apartment Advisor III, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/18/2017

 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596979899100101102103104105106107108109110111112113114115116117118119120121122123124125126127128129130131132133134135136137138139140141142143144145146147148149150151152153154155156157158159160161162163164165166167168169170171172173174175176177178179180181182183184185186187188189190191192193194195196197198 
 
 

 




















Current Offerings – KBS



























 



 







Park Place Village, Leawood, KS



 offer_details_slug equal to gallery? =  properties0




  Current Offerings



KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II is a non-traded real estate investment trust (REIT) focused on acquiring an investment portfolio with a total return profile that is composed of investments that provide capital appreciation potential and... Read more &Gt;



                                    View Offering
                                    

                                        Prospectus
                                    

                                            PRESENTATION
                                        






KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II - OFFERING


The following website material is neither an offer to sell nor a solicitation of an offer to buy shares of KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II; offering is only made by prospectus. This information must be preceded or accompanied by a prospectus in order to understand fully all of the implications and risks of the offering. Neither the Attorney General of the State of New York nor any other state regulators have passed on or endorsed the merits of this offering. Any representation to the contrary is unlawful.
Click on the document link to view prospectus and supplements. For more information contact the KBS Sales Desk: 866-527-4264
To continue please acknowledge that you have received a copy of the prospectus by clicking the button below. 
Please click on Important Risk Factors to learn more about risks you should consider:
Important Risk Factors 



Shares of KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II are not suitable for all investors and an investment in KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II is subject to substantial risks. These risks may include, but are not limited to:

The possibility of losing your entire investment.
No guarantees regarding future performance.
Upon sale or distribution of assets you may receive less than your initial investment.
Fluctuation of the value of the assets owned by KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II.
The absence of a public market for shares of KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II.
A lack of an operating history for KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II.
Limited transferability and lack of liquidity.
Reliance on its advisor to select investments, manage and dispose of assets.
Payment of significant fees to its advisor, its affiliates, and participating broker-dealers.
Lack of diversification in property holdings until significant funds have been raised.
Various economic factors that may include changes in interest rates, laws, operating expenses, insurance costs and tenant turnover. These factors may result in reduced earnings, reduction in value of notes/loans, delinquency of payments and default on loans owned by the REIT.
Continued disruptions in the financial markets and deteriorating economic conditions could adversely affect the value of KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s investments.

KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s organizational documents do not restrict it from paying distributions from any source and do not restrict the amount of distributions it may pay from any source, including offering proceeds or borrowings. Distributions paid from sources other than current or accumulated earnings and profits may constitute a return of capital. A return of capital would reduce the amount KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II would have for investment, which could reduce an investor’s return on investment and subsequent investors will experience dilution. There are no guarantees that KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II will pay distributions.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II will pay substantial fees to and expenses of KBS Capital Advisors, its affiliates and participating broker-dealers, which payments will increase the risk that stockholders will not earn a profit on their investment. KBS Capital Advisors and its affiliates, and KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s executive officers, its affiliated directors and other key professionals face conflicts of interest, including significant conflicts created by the advisor’s compensation arrangements with the REIT and other KBS-sponsored programs and KBS-advised investors.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s advisor and its affiliates receive fees in connection with transactions involving the purchase or origination and management of the REIT’s investments. These fees are based on the cost of the investment, and not based on the quality of the investment or the quality of the services rendered to the REIT. This may influence the advisor to recommend riskier transactions to the REIT.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II expects to use debt in connection with its investments, which increases the risk of loss associated with these investments and could hinder its ability to pay distributions to its stockholders or could decrease the value of its stockholders’ investments if income on, or the value of, the property securing the debt declines.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II may make adjustments to its target portfolio, based on real estate market conditions and investment opportunities. The REIT may change its targeted investments and investment guidelines at any time without the consent of its stockholders.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II expects to make foreign investments and will be susceptible to changes in currency exchange rates, adverse political or economic developments, lack of uniform accounting standards and changes in foreign laws which may adversely affect the investment portfolio of the REIT, thereby affecting the value of the investor’s investment in the REIT. Disruptions in the financial markets and uncertain economic conditions could adversely affect KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s ability to implement its business strategy and generate returns for its stockholders.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s charter does not require it to liquidate its assets and dissolve by a specified date, nor does the charter require it to list its shares for trading by a specified date. No public market currently exists for its shares, and it has no plans to list its shares on a national securities exchange. If a stockholder is able to sell his or her shares, that stockholder would likely have to sell them at a substantial discount from their public offering price.
If KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II does not raise significant proceeds in its public offering, it may not be able to acquire as diverse portfolio of real estate investments and the value of its stockholders’ investment may vary more widely with the performance of specific assets.
Disruptions in the financial markets and uncertain economic conditions could adversely affect KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s ability to implement its business strategy and generate returns for its stockholders.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s share price is set arbitrarily and the price is unrelated to the book or net value of assets owned by the REIT or to its expected operating income. No public market currently exists for shares of the REIT, and the REIT has no plans to list its shares on an exchange. In addition, the shares are subject to restrictions on transferability and re-sale and investors will be required to bear the financial risk of this investment for an indefinite period of time. If investors are able to sell shares, they will likely have to sell them at a substantial loss.
There is no guarantee that KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II will be able to provide liquidity by a certain date, or at all, or that any liquidity event would be successful. Investors may be required to hold their shares indefinitely.
Because KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II has not yet identified any specific investments to acquire, it is considered a blind pool.
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II intends to elect to be taxed as a REIT beginning with the taxable year ending December 31, 2014. Should KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II not qualify as a REIT, it will be subject to adverse tax consequences. Please refer to the prospectus for more detailed information regarding these consequences.
An investment in KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II’s shares is complex. Investors should read and consider the prospectus, as amended and supplemented, carefully before investing.





I agree







CLOSED OFFERINGS



KBS Growth & Income REIT
KBS Growth & Income REIT is a non-traded real estate investment trust (REIT) that closed its initial public... Read more &Gt;


                                    View Offering
                                    






KBS Real Estate Investment Trust III
KBS REIT III is a non-traded Real Estate Investment Trust (REIT) that closed its initial public offering on... Read more &Gt;


                                    View Offering
                                    






KBS Real Estate Investment Trust II
KBS REIT II is a non-traded Real Estate Investment Trust (REIT) that closed its initial public offering on... Read more &Gt;


                                    View Offering
                                    






KBS Real Estate Investment Trust I
KBS REIT I is a non-traded Real Estate Investment Trust (REIT) that closed its initial public offering on... Read more &Gt;


                                    View Offering
                                    






KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT is a non-traded Real Estate Investment Trust (REIT) that closed its initial public offering... Read more &Gt;


                                    View Offering
                                    






KBS Legacy Partners Apartment REIT
KBS Legacy Partners Apartment REIT is a non-traded Real Estate Investment Trust (REIT) that closed its initial public... Read more &Gt;


                                    View Offering
                                    











			    			Funds Raised 





Learn More






			    			Learning center 





Learn More







KBS CAPITAL MARKETS GROUP HAS ONE PURPOSE


 
To help financial advisors and their clients access alternative investment offerings with strategies that target both growth and income.


 


                Learn about KBS            





CONTINUE EXPLORING



                        Learning Center                    

                        How to invest                    

                        About KBS                    































KBS – Capital Markets Group




























 











Connecting individual
investors with institutional-quality
commercial real estate opportunities

                        View Offerings                    









Lincoln Court, Campbell, CA










Connecting individual
investors with institutional-quality
commercial real estate opportunities

                        View Offerings                    









The Offices at Greenhouse, Houston, TX










Connecting individual
investors with institutional-quality
commercial real estate opportunities

                        View Offerings                    









Von Karman Tech Center, Irvine, CA










Connecting individual
investors with institutional-quality
commercial real estate opportunities

                        View Offerings                    









Commonwealth, Portland, OR 97204










Connecting individual
investors with institutional-quality
commercial real estate opportunities

                        View Offerings                    









500 West Madison, Chicago, IL









CURRENT OFFERINGS








KBS Growth & Income REIT
KBS Growth & Income REIT is a non-traded real estate investment trust (REIT) that intends to acquire and manage a diverse portfolio of institutional-quality...


                                View Offering
                            

                                INVESTOR KIT
                            

                                PRESENTATION
                            








KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II
KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT II is a non-traded real estate investment trust (REIT) focused on acquiring an investment portfolio with a total return profile that...


                                View Offering
                            

                                INVESTOR KIT
                            

                                PRESENTATION
                            









KBS CAPITAL MARKETS GROUP HAS ONE PURPOSE


 
To help financial advisors and their clients access alternative investment offerings with strategies that target both growth and income.


 


                Learn About KBS            






FEATURED PROPERTIES








KBS REIT III
Promenade I & II at Éilan
San Antonio, TX
Visit Property 






KBS Strategic Opportunity REIT
Bellevue Technology Center
Bellevue, WA
Visit Property 






KBS REIT III
201 17th Street
Atlanta, GA
Visit Property 








KBS REIT III
Preston Commons
Dallas, TX
Visit Property 







TOTAL CAPITAL RAISED BY KBS CAPITAL MARKETS GROUP SINCE INCEPTION













CONTINUE EXPLORING



                        Learning center                    

                        How to invest                    

                        About KBS                    





















